Missouri, session 2026, SB1586.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 260.213, 260.330, and 260.335, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 260.213, 260.330, and 260.335, to read as
follows:
260.213. No person may knowingly sell, convey or
transfer title to any property that contains a permitted or
unpermitted solid waste disposal site or demolition
landfill, without disclosing [to] the sale, conveyance, or
transfer to the department of natural resources. The seller
shall inform the buyer with a written notice signed and
dated by the seller early in the negotiation process about
the existence and location of the disposal or landfill
site. If the seller fails to inform the buyer with the
written notice about the existence and location of the
disposal or landfill site under this section, the buyer may
cancel the sale agreement and the seller shall be required
to disburse to the buyer any earnest money paid by the buyer
to the seller. The seller shall also notify the buyer that
he may be assuming liability to the state for any remedial
action at the site, except that the sale, conveyance or
transfer of property shall not absolve any person
responsible for the illegal disposition of solid waste,


including the seller, of liability for any remedial action
at the site.
260.330. 1. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 6 of this section, effective October 1, 1990,
each operator of a solid waste sanitary landfill shall
collect a charge equal to one dollar and fifty cents per ton
or its volumetric equivalent of solid waste accepted and
each operator of the solid waste demolition landfill shall
collect a charge equal to one dollar per ton or its
volumetric equivalent of solid waste accepted. Each
operator shall submit the charge, less collection costs, to
the department of natural resources for deposit in the
"Solid Waste Management Fund" which is hereby created. On
October 1, 1992, and thereafter, the charge imposed herein
shall be adjusted annually by the same percentage as the
increase in the general price level as measured by the
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the United
States, or its successor index, as defined and officially
recorded by the United States Department of Labor or its
successor agency. No annual adjustment shall be made to the
charge imposed under this subsection during October 1, 2005,
to October 1, 2027, except an adjustment amount consistent
with the need to fund the operating costs of the department
and taking into account any annual percentage increase in
the total of the volumetric equivalent of solid waste
accepted in the prior year at solid waste sanitary landfills
and demolition landfills and solid waste to be transported
out of this state for disposal that is accepted at transfer
stations. No annual increase during October 1, 2005, to
October 1, 2027, shall exceed the percentage increase
measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
for the United States, or its successor index, as defined
and officially recorded by the United States Department of


Labor or its successor agency and calculated on the
percentage of revenues dedicated under subdivision (1) of
subsection 2 of section 260.335. Any such annual adjustment
shall only be made at the discretion of the director,
subject to appropriations. After October 1, 2027, an annual
adjustment shall be based on the percentage increase
measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
for the United States, or its successor index, as defined
and officially recorded by the United States Department of
Labor or its successor agency, for the preceding year.
Collection costs shall be established by the department and
shall not exceed two percent of the amount collected
pursuant to this section.
2. The department shall, by rule and regulation,
provide for the method and manner of collection.
3. The charges established in this section shall be
enumerated separately from the disposal fee charged by the
landfill and may be passed through to persons who generated
the solid waste. Moneys transmitted to the department shall
be no less than the amount collected less collection costs
and in a form, manner and frequency as the department shall
prescribe. The provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary
notwithstanding, moneys in the account shall not lapse to
general revenue at the end of each biennium. Failure to
collect the charge does not relieve the operator from
responsibility for transmitting an amount equal to the
charge to the department.
4. The department may examine or audit financial
records and landfill activity records and measure landfill
usage to verify the collection and transmittal of the
charges established in this section. The department may
promulgate by rule and regulation procedures to ensure and


to verify that the charges imposed herein are properly
collected and transmitted to the department.
5. Effective October 1, 1990, any person who operates
a transfer station in Missouri shall transmit a fee to the
department for deposit in the solid waste management fund
which is equal to one dollar and fifty cents per ton or its
volumetric equivalent of solid waste accepted. Such fee
shall be applicable to all solid waste to be transported out
of the state for disposal. On October 1, 1992, and
thereafter, the charge imposed herein shall be adjusted
annually by the same percentage as the increase in the
general price level as measured by the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers for the United States, or its
successor index, as defined and officially recorded by the
United States Department of Labor or its successor agency.
No annual adjustment shall be made to the charge imposed
under this subsection during October 1, 2005, to October 1,
2027, except an adjustment amount consistent with the need
to fund the operating costs of the department and taking
into account any annual percentage increase in the total of
the volumetric equivalent of solid waste accepted in the
prior year at solid waste sanitary landfills and demolition
landfills and solid waste to be transported out of this
state for disposal that is accepted at transfer stations.
No annual increase during October 1, 2005, to October 1,
2027, shall exceed the percentage increase measured by the
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the United
States, or its successor index, as defined and officially
recorded by the United States Department of Labor or its
successor agency and calculated on the percentage of
revenues dedicated under subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of
section 260.335. Any such annual adjustment shall only be
made at the discretion of the director, subject to


appropriations. After October 1, 2027, an annual adjustment
shall be based on the percentage increase measured by the
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the United
100 States, or its successor index, as defined and officially
101 recorded by the United States Department of Labor or its
102 successor agency, for the preceding year. The department
103 shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the
104 transmittal of fees and verification of waste volumes
105 transported out of state from transfer stations. Collection
106 costs shall also be established by the department and shall
107 not exceed two percent of the amount collected pursuant to
108 this subsection. A transfer station with the sole function
109 of separating materials for recycling or resource recovery
110 activities shall not be subject to the fee imposed in this
111 subsection.
112 6. Each political subdivision which owns an
113 operational solid waste disposal area may designate,
114 pursuant to this section, up to two free disposal days
115 during each calendar year. On any such free disposal day,
116 the political subdivision shall allow residents of the
117 political subdivision to dispose of any solid waste which
118 may be lawfully disposed of at such solid waste disposal
119 area free of any charge, and such waste shall not be subject
120 to any state fee pursuant to this section. Notice of any
121 free disposal day shall be posted at the solid waste
122 disposal area site and in at least one newspaper of general
123 circulation in the political subdivision no later than
124 fourteen days prior to the free disposal day.
260.335. 1. The department shall have the authority
to assess, investigate, test, remediate, and manage
abandoned solid waste disposal areas. For purposes of this
section, "abandoned" means that a legally responsible person
for the site cannot be identified, located, or was


determined to be financially insolvent by the department.
Each fiscal year eight hundred thousand dollars from the
solid waste management fund shall be made available, upon
appropriation, to the department and the environmental
improvement and energy resources authority to fund
activities that promote the development and maintenance of
markets for recovered materials. Each fiscal year up to two
hundred thousand dollars from the solid waste management
fund may be used by the department upon appropriation for
grants to solid waste management districts for district
grants and district operations. Only those solid waste
management districts that are allocated fewer funds under
subsection 2 of this section than if revenues had been
allocated based on the criteria in effect in this section on
August 27, 2004, are eligible for these grants. An eligible
district shall receive a proportionate share of these grants
based on that district's share of the total reduction in
funds for eligible districts calculated by comparing the
amount of funds allocated under subsection 2 of this section
with the amount of funds that would have been allocated
using the criteria in effect in this section on August 27,
2004. The department and the authority shall establish a
joint interagency agreement with the department of economic
development to identify state priorities for market
development and to develop the criteria to be used to judge
proposed projects. Additional moneys may be appropriated in
subsequent fiscal years if requested. The authority shall
establish a procedure to measure the effectiveness of the
grant program under this subsection and shall provide a
report to the governor and general assembly by January
fifteenth of each year regarding the effectiveness of the
program.


2. All remaining revenues deposited into the fund each
fiscal year after moneys have been made available under
subsection 1 of this section shall be allocated as follows:
(1) Thirty-nine percent of the revenues shall be
dedicated, upon appropriation, to the elimination of illegal
solid waste disposal, to identify and prosecute persons
disposing of solid waste illegally, to conduct solid waste
permitting activities, to administer grants and perform
other duties imposed in sections 260.200 to 260.345 and
section 260.432. In addition to the thirty-nine percent of
the revenues, the department may receive any annual increase
in the charge during October 1, 2005, to October 1, 2027,
under section 260.330 and such increases shall be used
solely to fund the operating costs of the department;
(2) [Sixty-one] Fifty-one percent of the revenues,
except any annual increases in the charge under section
260.330 during October 1, 2005, to October 1, 2027, which
shall be used solely to fund the operating costs of the
department, shall be allocated to solid waste management
districts. Revenues to be allocated under this subdivision
shall be divided as follows: forty percent shall be
allocated based on the population of each district in the
latest decennial census, and sixty percent shall be
allocated based on the amount of revenue generated within
each district. For the purposes of this subdivision,
revenue generated within each district shall be determined
from the previous year's data. No more than fifty percent
of the revenue allocable under this subdivision may be
allocated to the districts upon approval of the department
for implementation of a solid waste management plan and
district operations, and at least fifty percent of the
revenue allocable to the districts under this subdivision
shall be allocated to the cities and counties of the


district or to persons or entities providing solid waste
management, waste reduction, recycling and related services
in these cities and counties. Each district shall receive a
minimum of seventy-five thousand dollars under this
subdivision. After August 28, 2015, each district shall
receive a minimum of ninety-five thousand dollars under this
subdivision for district grants and district operations.
Each district receiving moneys under this subdivision shall
expend such moneys pursuant to a solid waste management plan
required under section 260.325, and only in the case that
the district is in compliance with planning requirements
established by the department. Moneys shall be awarded
based upon grant applications. The following criteria may
be considered to establish the order of district grant
priority:
(a) Grants to facilities of organizations employing
individuals with disabilities under sections 178.900 to
178.960 or sections 205.968 to 205.972;
(b) Grants for proposals that will promote and
maximize the sharing of district resources;
(c) Grants for proposals which provide methods of
recycling and solid waste reduction; and
(d) All other grants. Any allocated district moneys
remaining in any fiscal year due to insufficient or
inadequate grant applications shall be reallocated for grant
applications in subsequent years or for solid waste
management projects other than district operations,
including a district's next request for solid waste
management project proposals.
100 Any allocated district moneys remaining after a period of
101 five years shall revert to the credit of the solid waste
102 management fund created under section 260.330;


103 (3) [Except for the amount up to one-fourth of the
104 department's previous fiscal year expense, any remaining
105 unencumbered funds generated under subdivision (1) of this
106 subsection in prior fiscal years shall be reallocated under
107 this section] Ten percent of revenue shall be allocated to
108 the department for the purpose of administering the
109 provisions of subsection 1 of this section relating to the
110 assessment, investigation, testing, remediation, and
111 managing of abandoned solid waste disposal areas;
112 (4) If there are no more abandoned solid waste
113 disposal areas left in existence in the state in any given
114 year, the percentage of revenue shall increase from fifty-
115 one to sixty-one percent for the purpose of administering
116 the provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this
117 section;
118 [(4)] (5) Funds may be made available under this
119 subsection for the administration and grants of the used
120 motor oil program described in section 260.253;
121 [(5)] (6) The department and the environmental
122 improvement and energy resources authority shall conduct
123 sample audits of grants provided under this subsection.
124 3. In addition to the criteria listed in this section,
125 the advisory board created in section 260.345 shall
126 recommend criteria to be used to allocate grant moneys to
127 districts, cities and counties. These criteria shall
128 establish a priority for proposals which provide methods of
129 solid waste reduction and recycling. The department shall
130 promulgate criteria for evaluating grants by rule and
131 regulation. Projects of cities and counties located within
132 a district which are funded by grants under this section
133 shall conform to the district solid waste management plan.
134 4. The funds awarded to the districts pursuant to this
135 section shall be used for the purposes set forth in sections


136 260.300 to 260.345, and shall be used in addition to
137 existing funds appropriated by counties and cities for solid
138 waste management and shall not supplant county or city
139 appropriated funds.
140 5. Once grants are approved by the solid waste
141 management district, the district shall submit to the
142 department the appropriate forms associated with the grant
143 application and any supporting information to verify that
144 appropriate public notice procedures were followed, that
145 grant proposals were reviewed and ranked by the district,
146 and that only eligible costs as set forth in regulations are
147 to be funded. Within thirty days, the department shall
148 review the grant application. If the department finds any
149 deficiencies, or needs more information in order to evaluate
150 the grant application, the department shall notify the
151 district in writing. The district shall have an additional
152 thirty days to respond to the department's request and to
153 submit any additional information to the department. Within
154 thirty days of receiving additional information, the
155 department shall either approve or deny the grant
156 application. If the department takes no action, the grant
157 application shall be deemed approved. The department, in
158 conjunction with the solid waste advisory board, shall
159 review the performance of all grant recipients to ensure
160 that grant moneys were appropriately and effectively
161 expended to further the purposes of the grant, as expressed
162 in the recipient's grant application. The grant application
163 shall contain specific goals and implementation dates, and
164 grant recipients shall be contractually obligated to fulfill
165 same. The department may require the recipient to submit
166 periodic reports and such other data as are necessary, both
167 during the grant period and up to five years thereafter, to
168 ensure compliance with this section. The department may


169 audit the records of any recipient to ensure compliance with
170 this section. Recipients of grants under sections 260.300
171 to 260.345 shall maintain such records as required by the
172 department. If a grant recipient fails to maintain records
173 or submit reports as required herein, refuses the department
174 access to the records, or fails to meet the department's
175 performance standards, the department may withhold
176 subsequent grant payments, if any, and may compel the
177 repayment of funds provided to the recipient pursuant to a
178 grant.
179 6. The department shall provide for a security
180 interest in any machinery or equipment purchased through
181 grant moneys distributed pursuant to this section.
182 7. If the moneys are not transmitted to the department
183 within the time frame established by the rule promulgated,
184 interest shall be imposed on the moneys due the department
185 at the rate of ten percent per annum from the prescribed due
186 date until payment is actually made. These interest amounts
187 shall be deposited to the credit of the solid waste
188 management fund.